Utah statutes.
35A-3-302.   Eligibility requirements.
(1)  The program of cash assistance provided under this part is known as the
Family Employment Program.
(2) (a)  The division shall submit a state plan to the Secretary of the United
States Department of Health and Human Services to obtain federal funding under
the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Block Grant.
(b)  The division shall make the plan consistent with this part and federal
law.
(c)  If a discrepancy arises between a provision of the state plan and this
part, this part supersedes the provision in the state plan.
(3)  The services and supports under this part are for both one-parent and
two-parent families.
(4)  To be eligible for cash assistance under this part, a family shall:
(a)  have at least one minor dependent child; or
(b)  have a parent who is in the third trimester of a pregnancy.
(5)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the department shall make rules for eligibility and the amount of cash
assistance a family is eligible to receive under this part based on:
(a)  family size;
(b)  family income;
(c)  income disregards; and
(d)  other relevant factors.
(6)  The division shall disregard money on deposit in an Individual
Development Account established under Section 35A-3-312 in determining
eligibility.
(7)  The department shall provide for an appeal of a determination of
eligibility in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures
Act.
(8) (a)  The department shall make a report to either the Legislature's
Executive Appropriations Committee or the Commerce and Workforce Services
Appropriations Subcommittee on any proposed rule change made under Subsection
(5) that would modify the eligibility requirements or the amount of cash
assistance a family would be eligible to receive.
(b)  The department shall submit the report prior to implementing the proposed
rule change and the report shall include:
(i)  a description of the department's current practice or policy that it is
proposing to change;
(ii)  an explanation of why the department is proposing the change;
(iii)  the effect of an increase or decrease in cash benefits on families; and
(iv)  the fiscal impact of the proposed change.
(c)  The department may use the Notice of Proposed Rule Amendment form filed
with the Division of Administrative Rules as its report so long as the notice
contains all the information required under Subsection (8)(b).
